Nevada, session 83, AB14.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 244.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.020 1. County commissioners must [be] :
(a) Be qualified electors of their respective counties ;
(b) Be registered to vote in this State; and [have]
(c) Have such other qualifications as are provided in this
chapter.
2. No county or township officer is eligible to the office of
county commissioner.
Sec. 2. NRS 246.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
246.010 1. County clerks shall be elected by the qualified
electors of their respective counties.
2. County clerks must be registered to vote in this State.
3. County clerks shall be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 3. NRS 247.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
as altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507,
county recorders must be [elected] :
(a) Registered to vote in this State; and
(b) Elected by the qualified electors of their respective counties.
2. County recorders must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
3. The Clerk of Carson City is ex officio the Recorder of
Carson City.
Sec. 4. NRS 248.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
248.005 1. No person is eligible to the office of sheriff unless
the person:
(a) Will have attained the age of 21 years on the date he or she
would take office if so elected;
(b) Is a qualified elector;
(c) Is registered to vote in this State; and
[(c)] (d) On or after January 1, 2010, meets the requirements set
forth in subsection 2 or 3, as applicable.
2. If a person described in paragraph [(c)] (d) of subsection 1 is
a candidate for the office of sheriff in a county whose population is
30,000 or more, the person must meet the following requirements at
the time he or she files his or her declaration of candidacy for the
office:
(a) He or she has a history of at least 5 consecutive years of
employment or service:
(1) As a peace officer;
(2) As a law enforcement officer of an agency of the United
States;
(3) As a law enforcement officer of another state or political
subdivision thereof; or
(4) In any combination of the positions described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3); and
(b) He or she has:
(1) Been certified as a category I peace officer by the
Commission;
(2) Been certified as a category I peace officer or its
equivalent by the certifying authority of another state that, as
determined by the Commission, imposes requirements for
certification as a category I peace officer in this State; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(3) Successfully completed a federal law enforcement
training program approved by the Commission.
3. If a person described in paragraph [(c)] (d) of subsection 1 is
a candidate for the office of sheriff in a county whose population is
less than 30,000, the person is not required to meet any requirements
with respect to employment, service, certification or training at the
time he or she files his or her declaration of candidacy for the office.
However, such a person forfeits his or her office if, within 1 year
after the date on which the person takes office, the person fails to
earn certification by the Commission as a category I peace officer,
category II peace officer or category III peace officer.
4. A person who has been convicted of a felony in this State or
any other state is not qualified to be a candidate for or elected or
appointed to the office of sheriff regardless of whether the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Category I peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.460.
(b) “Category II peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.470.
(c) “Category III peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.480.
(d) “Commission” means the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission created pursuant to NRS 289.500.
(e) “Declaration of candidacy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.0455.
(f) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
Sec. 5. NRS 249.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
249.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
as altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507,
county treasurers must be [elected] :
(a) Registered to vote in this State; and
(b) Elected by the qualified electors of their respective counties.
2. County treasurers must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
3. The county clerks of Churchill, Douglas, Esmeralda, Eureka,
Lyon, Mineral, Pershing and Storey Counties are ex officio county
treasurers of their respective counties, unless such an arrangement is
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 6. NRS 250.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.010 1. County assessors shall be elected by the qualified
electors of their counties.
2. County assessors must be registered to vote in this State.
3. County assessors shall be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their offices on the first Monday of January subsequent to
their election.
Sec. 7. NRS 252.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
252.010 No person shall be a candidate for or be eligible to the
office of district attorney unless the person is:
1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada.
2. Registered to vote in this State.
3. An attorney duly licensed and admitted to practice law in all
the courts of this state.
Sec. 8. NRS 253.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
253.010 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 253.125:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5 or as
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507, public
administrators must be elected by the qualified electors of their
respective counties.
2. Public administrators must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922 and at the general
election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the duties of
their office on the first Monday of January after their election.
3. The public administrator of a county must:
(a) Be a qualified elector of the county;
(b) Be registered to vote in this State;
(c) Be at least 21 years of age on the date he or she will take
office;
[(c)] (d) Not have been convicted of a felony for which his or
her civil rights have not been restored; and
[(d)] (e) Not have been found liable in a civil action involving a
finding of fraud, misrepresentation, material omission,
misappropriation, theft or conversion.
4. The district attorneys of Humboldt, Lander, Lincoln, Storey
and White Pine Counties are ex officio public administrators of
Humboldt County, Lander County, Lincoln County, Storey County
and White Pine County, respectively, unless such an arrangement is
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507. The
Clerk of Carson City shall serve as Public Administrator of Carson
City.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
5. In a county other than Carson City and Humboldt, Lander,
Lincoln, Storey and White Pine Counties, if, for any reason, the
office of public administrator becomes vacant, the board of county
commissioners may appoint a public administrator for the remainder
of the unexpired term.
Sec. 9. NRS 258.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.005 1. No person is eligible to the office of constable
unless the person:
(a) Will have attained the age of 21 years on the date he or she
would take office if so elected or appointed; [and]
(b) Is a qualified elector [.] ; and
(c) Is registered to vote in this State.
2. A person who has been convicted of a felony in this state or
any other state is not qualified to be a candidate for or elected or
appointed to the office of constable regardless of whether the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights.
Sec. 10. Section 2.010 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
52, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 239, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 2.010 Board of Supervisors: Qualifications;
election; term of office.
1. The legislative power of Carson City is vested in a
Board of Supervisors consisting of five Supervisors,
including the Mayor.
2. The Mayor must be:
(a) An actual and bona fide resident of Carson City for at
least 6 months immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within Carson City.
3. Each Supervisor must be:
(a) An actual and bona fide resident of Carson City for at
least 6 months immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within the ward which he or she
represents.
(c) Registered to vote in this State.
(d) A resident of the ward which he or she represents,
except that changes effected in the boundaries of a ward
pursuant to the provisions of section 1.060 do not affect the
right of any elected Supervisor to continue in office for the
term for which he or she was elected.
4. All Supervisors, including the Mayor, must be voted
upon by the registered voters of Carson City at large and shall
serve for terms of 4 years. Each term of office:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) Begins at midnight on the first Monday in January
following the general election; and
(b) Ends at 11:59 p.m. on the day immediately preceding
the first Monday in January following the general election.
Sec. 11. 1. The amendatory provisions of this bill do not
apply to a person who, on July 1, 2025:
(a) Holds the office of county commissioner, county clerk,
county recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, district attorney,
public administrator or constable; or
(b) Is a Supervisor on the Board of Supervisors in Carson City.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, the
amendatory provisions of this bill apply to every person who, after
July 1, 2025, files a declaration of candidacy for:
(a) The office of county commissioner, county clerk, county
recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, district attorney, public
administrator or constable; or
(b) The office of Supervisor on the Board of Supervisors in
Carson City.
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)